Maryland, session 2025, HB1055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “Commission” means the Commission on Nondiscrimination.
(b) There is a Commission on Nondiscrimination.
(c) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) one representative of the Executive Branch, appointed by the Governor;
(4) one representative of the Judicial Branch, appointed by the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(5) the Executive Director of the Maryland Commission on Civil Rights, or
the Executive Director’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1055*

HOUSE BILL 1055
(6) two representatives of the Office of the Attorney General, at least one
of whom must work in the Civil Rights Division, appointed by the Attorney General; and
(7) the following members, appointed jointly by the President of the Senate
and the Speaker of the House:
(i) three representatives of local human rights commissions, one
each from the Eastern, Central, and Western regions of the State;
(ii) two representatives of the Maryland State Bar Association, one
of whom represents plaintiffs and one of whom represents defendants in discrimination
cases; and
(iii) three representatives of legal advocacy groups in the State that
focus on civil rights and discrimination.
(d) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall designate a
member who is a Senator and a member who is a Delegate, respectively, to serve as cochairs
of the Commission.
(e) The Maryland Commission on Civil Rights and the Civil Rights Division of the
Office of the Attorney General shall provide staff for the Commission.
(f) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) The Commission shall:
(1) study how the State can:
(i) realize the principle of equality under the law;
(ii) afford greater protections against unequal or unfair treatment
under State and local law;
(iii) eliminate discrimination against individuals on the basis of the
individual’s race, color, religion, ancestry or national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual
orientation, gender identity, military status, disability, or other protected class in law that
is not specifically enumerated in this item; and
(iv) ensure that individuals listed in item (iii) of this item have
effective remedies for discrimination under the law;

HOUSE BILL 1055 3
(2) monitor and study the impacts of the potential and actual actions of the
federal government on civil rights and nondiscrimination enforcement at the federal, State,
and local levels;
(3) identify gaps, inconsistencies, or deficiencies in the current State and
local frameworks for civil rights and nondiscrimination enforcement, including:
(i) nondiscrimination laws or regulations without specific
enforcement mechanisms in the State;
(ii) overburdened courts and administrative agencies;
(iii) funding issues;
(iv) inconsistent protections for groups between different
nondiscrimination provisions;
(v) groups facing discrimination that lack protections or have gaps
in protections under the law;
(vi) subjects or situations where individuals do not currently have
discrimination protections under the law; and
(vii) nondiscrimination laws or regulations that do not have an
associated private right of action; and
(4) recommend legislation to address any adverse impacts and potential
gaps, inconsistencies, or deficiencies in civil rights and nondiscrimination laws or
regulations.
(h) The Commission may:
(1) hold public meetings across the State to carry out the duties of the
Commission; and
(2) convene workgroups to solicit input from stakeholders.
(i) On or before December 15 each year, the Commission shall submit a report on
its findings and recommendations, including any legislative proposals, to the Governor and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. It shall remain effective through June 30, 2029, and, at the end of June 30, 2029,

HOUSE BILL 1055
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.